Hawaii statutes.
[§342D-108] Exemption for vessels in
innocent passage. This part does not apply to a commercial passenger
vessel that operates in the marine waters of the State solely in innocent
passage. For purposes of this section, a vessel is engaged in innocent passage
if its operation in marine waters of the State, regardless of whether the
vessel is a United States or foreign-flag vessel, would constitute innocent
passage under the United Nations Convention on the Law of the Sea 1982,
December 10, 1982, United Nations Publication No. E.83.V.5, 21 I.L.M. 1261
(1982), were the vessel a foreign-flag vessel. [L 2005, c 217, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next